Colorado, session 2026A, SB012.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-4.1-109, amend
(1)(i) and (1)(k); and add (1)(m) and (1)(n) as follows:
24-4.1-109. Losses compensable.
(1) Losses compensable under this part 1 resulting from death of or
injury to a victim include:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(i) Reasonable travel expenses for a victim related to funeral, burial,
medical care, or mental health counseling, OR TRADITIONAL HEALING
CEREMONIES, INCLUDING AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(m) OF THIS
SECTION;
(k) Dependent care services; and
(m) EXPENSES FOR TRADITIONAL NATIVE AMERICAN HEALING
CEREMONIES AND PRACTICES FOR PERSONS WHO ARE INDIGENOUS AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-33.5-2601, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO:
(I) TRADITIONAL COUNSELING AND HEALING FROM AN ELDER OR
SPIRITUAL HEALER;
(II) TRADITIONAL CEREMONIAL PRACTICES;
(III) CEREMONIAL BURIALS, INCLUDING CLOTHING FOR THE
DECEASED, MEALS, AND OTHER EXPENSES RELATED TO TRADITIONAL
GIVEAWAY OR GIFTING PRACTICES;
(IV) CHILD CARE DURING BURIAL CEREMONIES; AND
(V) REIMBURSEMENT FOR HONORARIA PROVIDED IN CONNECTION
WITH CEREMONIAL SERVICES; AND
(n) REASONABLE TRAVEL EXPENSES RELATED TO TRADITIONAL
NATIVE AMERICAN HEALING CEREMONIES AND PRACTICES, AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(m) OF THIS SECTION, FOR A VICTIM WHO IS INDIGENOUS, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-33.5-2601.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-012

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-012